District of Columbia statutes.
47-2319

Judicial review.

Any person aggrieved by a final determination of tax or by a denial of a claim for refund, other than a refund of tax finally determined in § 47-2316, may within 6 months from the date of assessment of the deficiency, or from the date of the denial of a claim for refund, appeal to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia in the same manner and to the same extent as set forth in §§ 47-3303 and 47-3304 as amended.

Apr. 23, 1924, 43 Stat. 106, ch. 131, § 22
as added Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-128, § 11(i), 28 DCR 246
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-2319.